2_Optimized Recursive File Scanning & Data Extraction /analyzedir/tests/tests-2/test5/hyph-pl.hyp.txt
be-zach
be-zami
by-naj-mniej
gdzie-nie-gdzie
ina-czej
na-dal
ni-gdy
ni-gdzie
niech-??e
niech-by
ow-szem
p??-??ach
p??-??ami
p??-??ek
pod-??w-czas
przy-naj-mniej
sk??d-in??d
tr??-jach
tr??-jami
tr??-jek
